Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-665
Amendment; when effective.

Such proposed amendment shall become effective and in full force immediately upon the issuance of such certificate of approval by the Nebraska Power Review Board. Thereupon and thereafter the district shall, as in case of the original district, be a public corporation and political subdivision, and operate and function accordingly in such reduced and subdivided area, or such increased and enlarged area, under or subject to the terms, powers, privileges, and conditions of Chapter 70, article 6.

Laws 1937, c. 152, § 9, p. 589;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-717;

R.S.1943, § 70-665;

Laws 1981, LB 181, § 30.